test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-suhvli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suhvli: # Noun (5, 2) 'laatikko'
     suhvli+N+Sg+Nom: suhvli
     suhvli+N+Sg+Gen: suhvli
     suhvli+N+Sg+Par: suhvlit
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ill: [suhvlihe, suhvlidõ]
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ine: [suhvlin, suhvlih, suhvlihn]
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ela: suhvlist
     suhvli+N+Sg+All: suhvlilõ
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ade: suhvlil
     suhvli+N+Sg+Abl: suhvlilt
     suhvli+N+Sg+Tra: suhvlis
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ter: suhvliniq
     suhvli+N+Sg+Abe: suhvlildaq
     suhvli+N+Sg+Com: suhvligaq
     suhvli+N+Pl+Nom: suhvliq
     suhvli+N+Pl+Gen: [suhvlidõ, suhvliidõ]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Par: [suhvlit, suhvliid]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ill: [suhvlihe, suhvliihe, suhvlidõ, suhvliidõ]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ine: [suhvlin, suhvliin, suhvlih, suhvliih, suhvlihn, suhvliihn]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ela: [suhvlist, suhvliist]
     suhvli+N+Pl+All: [suhvlilõ, suhvliilõ]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ade: [suhvlil, suhvliil]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Abl: [suhvlilt, suhvliilt]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Tra: [suhvlis, suhvliis]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ter: [suhvliniq, suhvliiniq]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Abe: [suhvlildaq, suhvliildaq]
     suhvli+N+Pl+Com: [suhvlidõgaq, suhvliidõgaq]
